Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202060-4,155
Department; duties; rules and regulations.

The Department of Motor Vehicles shall establish standards and requirements for the testing of applicants for commercial drivers' licenses, endorsements, and restrictions. The standards and requirements developed by the department for written knowledge and driving skills examinations for commercial drivers' licenses shall substantially comply with the requirements of the Commercial Driver's License Standards, 49 C.F.R. part 383, subparts G and H. The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this section.

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 105;

Laws 2019, LB270, § 37.